Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko S.F. 210 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 147.11A Issuance of licenses ââ 1 investigation ââ suspension. 2 1. a. Prior to issuing a license to an applicant, a board 3 shall conduct a search of the national practitioner data bank 4 to review the available record and determine whether the 5 information in the data bank constitutes grounds to decline to 6 issue a license to an applicant or to conduct an additional 7 investigation of the applicant prior to issuing a license. 8 b. Beginning on July 1, 2026, prior to issuing a license 9 to an applicant, a board shall conduct a search of the 10 integrated database created pursuant to subsection 3 to review 11 the available record and determine whether the information 12 in the integrated database constitutes grounds to decline to 13 issue a license to an applicant or to conduct an additional 14 investigation of the applicant prior to issuing a license. 15 2. Prior to issuing a license to an applicant, the board 16 shall conduct a search of the child abuse registry and sex 17 offender registry. Notwithstanding any other provision of 18 law to the contrary, if either search results in a positive 19 identification of the applicant, the board shall not issue a 20 license to the applicant. 21 3. No later than July 1, 2026, the department of 22 inspections, appeals, and licensing shall create and make 23 available to the public at no cost an integrated online 24 database of all licensees, including all records available 25 through the national practitioner data bank and all state 26 disciplinary actions and records. The integrated database 27 shall include a clearly identifiable function that identifies 28 whether each licensee has had a complaint filed against the 29 licensee for sexual misconduct or sexual assault, as those 30 terms are defined in section 147.58, substance use, medical 31 malpractice, or substandard practice. 32 4. If a board identifies a founded case of sexual 33 misconduct, as defined in section 147.58, by an applicant for a 34 license, the board shall not issue a license to the applicant 35 -1- LSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 9 S.F. 210 unless ten years have elapsed since the conduct giving rise 1 to the case, and the applicant has completed a problematic 2 sexualized behavior treatment program. 3 5. If a board identifies a founded case of sexual 4 misconduct, as defined in section 147.58, by a licensee, the 5 board shall immediately suspend the license of the licensee 6 until ten years have elapsed since the conduct giving rise 7 to the case, and the licensee has completed a problematic 8 sexualized behavior treatment program. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 147.11B Duty to report ââ continuing 10 education. 11 A licensee shall report any other licensee to the relevant 12 board that the licensee knows to have violated a law or rule 13 regarding sexual misconduct, sexual assault, or substance use 14 within five days of obtaining such knowledge. Each board 15 shall require each licensee to complete at least one hour 16 of continuing education per licensure renewal cycle on the 17 licenseeâs duty to report. A failure to report as required by 18 this section shall constitute grounds for discipline. 19 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 147.57 Employee discipline ââ 20 insurance ââ reporting. 21 1. Each person who employs a licensee shall submit to 22 the board who licenses the person information regarding all 23 disciplinary actions taken against the licensee. 24 2. Upon the receipt of a complaint against a licensee, a 25 board shall provide a copy of the complaint to the licenseeâs 26 employer, all insurance carriers who have billed for the 27 licenseeâs services in the past year, and the licenseeâs 28 medical malpractice insurance company, if applicable, if 29 the board receives the express written permission of the 30 complainant. 31 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 147.58 Licensee discipline ââ 32 problematic sexual behavior. 33 1. For the purposes of this section: 34 a. âSexual assaultâ means any type of sexual activity or 35 -2- LSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko 2/ 9 S.F. 210 contact without consent, including through use of physical 1 force, threats of force, coercion, and manipulation. 2 b. âSexual misconductâ means a behavior that exploits the 3 health professional-patient relationship in a sexual way. 4 Sexual behavior may be verbal or physical, can occur in person 5 or virtually, and may include expressions of thoughts and 6 feelings or gestures that are of a sexual nature or that a 7 patient or surrogate may reasonably construe as sexual. âSexual 8 misconductâ includes gestures or language that are seductive, 9 sexually suggestive, or sexually demeaning to a patient. 10 2. Upon receipt of a complaint of sexual misconduct against 11 a licensee, a board shall issue a probationary order against 12 the licensee requiring supervised practice until the board has 13 completed its investigation of the complaint. 14 3. Upon receipt of a complaint of sexual assault against a 15 licensee, a board shall immediately suspend the license of the 16 licensee until the board has completed its investigation of the 17 complaint. 18 4. Each board shall prioritize investigations of sexual 19 misconduct and sexual assault such that, on average, 20 investigation takes no longer than thirty days after the date 21 of receipt of the complaint. 22 5. a. A board shall immediately suspend the license of 23 a licensee charged with a sexual abuse offense under chapter 24 709, or a human trafficking offense under chapter 710A, or a 25 substantially similar statute in another state, regardless of 26 whether the activity occurred within the scope of practice of 27 the licensed profession. 28 b. A board shall permanently revoke the license of a 29 licensee convicted of a sexual abuse offense under chapter 30 709, or a human trafficking offense under chapter 710A, or a 31 substantially similar statute in another state, regardless of 32 whether the activity occurred within the scope of practice of 33 the licensed profession. A board shall not reinstate a license 34 revoked pursuant to this paragraph unless the conviction is 35 -3- LSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko 3/ 9 S.F. 210 reversed or overturned. 1 6. a. A law enforcement officer shall provide all 2 information gathered pursuant to an investigation of a sexual 3 abuse offense under chapter 709, or a human trafficking offense 4 under chapter 710A, allegedly committed by a licensee to each 5 board who licenses the licensee if the law enforcement officer 6 terminates the investigation without requesting that charges 7 be filed, charges against the licensee are dropped, or the 8 conviction of the licensee is overturned. 9 b. A board that receives investigative information submitted 10 pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall permanently revoke the license 11 of a licensee if the board finds by a preponderance of the 12 evidence that the sexual abuse offense under chapter 709 or 13 human trafficking offense under chapter 710A occurred. The 14 board may also utilize information submitted pursuant to 15 paragraph âaâ as the basis of other disciplinary action that the 16 board may impose as provided by rule or law. 17 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 147.59 Disclosure of probationary 18 status. 19 A licensee who is practicing on a probationary basis shall 20 provide a written disclosure regarding the basis for the 21 licenseeâs probationary status to a person or the personâs 22 guardian or third-party representative, as applicable, prior to 23 providing a service to the person. 24 Sec. 6. Section 148.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Prior to granting a license to an 27 applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery or 28 osteopathic medicine and surgery who has practiced in another 29 state, the board shall obtain disciplinary history from each 30 state in which the applicant has practiced, which shall include 31 information from cases that have not been fully adjudicated. 32 The board shall review the data obtained pursuant to this 33 subsection and determine whether the data requires the board 34 to decline to issue a license or to conduct an additional 35 -4- LSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko 4/ 9 S.F. 210 investigation prior to issuing a license. 1 Sec. 7. Section 148.6, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. For a licensee employed by a health 4 insurer, denying a claim for any reason not supported by the 5 sound medical judgment of the licensee. 6 Sec. 8. Section 272C.6, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 7 2025, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. In order to assure a free flow of information for 9 accomplishing the purposes of this section , and notwithstanding 10 section 622.10 , all complaint files, investigation files, other 11 investigation reports, and other investigative information in 12 the possession of a licensing board or peer review committee 13 acting under the authority of a licensing board or its 14 employees or agents which relates to licensee discipline 15 are privileged and confidential until the conclusion of the 16 investigation , and are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or 17 other means of legal compulsion for their release to a person 18 other than the licensee and the boards, their employees and 19 agents involved in licensee discipline, and are not admissible 20 in evidence in a judicial or administrative proceeding other 21 than the proceeding involving licensee discipline until the 22 conclusion of the investigation . However, investigative 23 information in the possession of a licensing board or its 24 employees or agents which relates to licensee discipline may 25 be disclosed to appropriate licensing authorities within this 26 state, the appropriate licensing authority in another state, 27 the coordinated licensure information system provided for in 28 the nurse licensure compact contained in section 152E.1 or 29 the advanced practice registered nurse compact contained in 30 section 152E.3 , the District of Columbia, or a territory or 31 country in which the licensee is licensed or has applied for a 32 license. If the investigative information in the possession 33 of a licensing board or its employees or agents indicates a 34 crime has been committed, the information shall be reported 35 -5- LSB 2056XS (2) 91 ss/ko 5/ 9 S.F. 210 to the proper law enforcement agency. However, a final 1 written decision and finding of fact of a licensing board in a 2 disciplinary proceeding, including a decision referred to in 3 section 272C.3, subsection 4 , is a public record. A licensing 4 board shall not release personally identifiable information 5 regarding a complaint without the express written permission 6 of the complainant. 7 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 622.14 Licensed health professional 8 ââ investigative information. 9 Disciplinary records of a person licensed pursuant to 10 chapter 147 shall be admissible to the extent that they show a 11 pattern of misconduct or a breach of professional duties. 12